Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
612

JURORS

Part I. Selection and Service

Section

612-1 Declaration of policy

612-2 Prohibition of discrimination

612-3 Definitions

612-4 Grounds of qualification and
disqualification

612-5 Disqualification by interest

612-6 Exempt when

612-7 Excused when, for cause

612-8 Pay of jurors; mileage fee; bus fare; parking

violations exemption

612-9 Certificate for jury pay

612-10 Repealed

612-11 Master list

612-12 Master jury wheel

612-13 Juror qualification form

612-14 Qualified jury wheel

612-15 Certified jury lists

612-16 Grand jury

612-17 Trial jury

612-18 Trial jury; additional requirements

612-19 Summoning of prospective jurors

612-20 Requests for exemption or excuse

612-21 Jurors disqualified, exempted, or excused

612-22 Trial jurors subject to one year of
service; one day

or one trial requirement

612-23 Challenging compliance with selection
procedures

612-24 Preservation of records

612-25 Protection of jurors' employment

612-26 Use of electronic or other means for
drawing grand

and trial juries

612-27 Rules

Part II. Grand Jury Counsel and Proceedings

612-51 Grand jury counsel; appointment and
removal

612-52 Grand jury counsel; qualifications

612-53 Grand jury counsel; length of term;
extension of

term; limitation on reappointment

612-54 Grand jury counsel; call to duty

612-55 Grand jury counsel; compensation

612-56 Grand jury counsel; disqualification

612-57 Grand jury counsel; duties

612-58 Grand jury proceedings

612-59 Dismissal of indictment

612-60 Grand jury counsel; court review

Law Journals and Reviews

The Prosecutor's Duty to Disclose Exculpatory Evidence to the
Grand Jury: Did the Hawaii Supreme Court Retreat from Fundamental Fairness? 2
UH L. Rev. 145 (1979).

Case Notes

Trial court's reassigning from the jury venire to other
trials occurring that day potential jurors who admitted having knowledge about
the case did not result in a "substantial failure to comply" with the
provisions of this chapter and did not prejudice defendant. 98 H. 1, 41 P.3d
157 (2002).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next